Windows-l10n-central/et/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/et.aff
# rule/flag 1658 (affects 17417 words, has 119 subrules):
SFX o Y 119
SFX o d vatki ud
SFX o ga idki uga
SFX o ga iga uga
SFX o ga igagi uga
SFX o ga ikski uga
SFX o ga ilegi uga
SFX o ga ilgi uga
SFX o ga iltki uga
SFX o ga im ega
SFX o ga ima ega
SFX o ga imad ega
SFX o ga imadki ega
SFX o ga imaga ega
SFX o ga imagagi ega
SFX o ga imagi ega
SFX o ga imaid ega
SFX o ga imaidki ega
SFX o ga imaiga ega
SFX o ga imaigagi ega
SFX o ga imaiks ega
SFX o ga imaikski ega
SFX o ga imail ega
SFX o ga imaile ega
SFX o ga imailegi ega
SFX o ga imailgi ega
SFX o ga imailt ega
SFX o ga imailtki ega
SFX o ga imaina ega
SFX o ga imainagi ega
SFX o ga imaini ega
SFX o ga imainigi ega
SFX o ga imais ega
SFX o ga imaiski ega
SFX o ga imaisse ega
SFX o ga imaissegi ega
SFX o ga imaist ega
SFX o ga imaistki ega
SFX o ga imaita ega
SFX o ga imaitagi ega
SFX o ga imaks ega
SFX o ga imakski ega
SFX o ga imal ega
SFX o ga imale ega
SFX o ga imalegi ega
SFX o ga imalgi ega
SFX o ga imalt ega
SFX o ga imaltki ega
SFX o ga imana ega
SFX o ga imanagi ega
SFX o ga imani ega
SFX o ga imanigi ega
SFX o ga imas ega
SFX o ga imaski ega
SFX o ga imasse ega
SFX o ga imassegi ega
SFX o ga imast ega
SFX o ga imastki ega
SFX o ga imat ega
SFX o ga imata ega
SFX o ga imatagi ega
SFX o ga imate ega
SFX o ga imatega ega
SFX o ga imategagi ega
SFX o ga imategi ega
SFX o ga imateks ega
SFX o ga imatekski ega
SFX o ga imatel ega
SFX o ga imatele ega
SFX o ga imatelegi ega
SFX o ga imatelgi ega
SFX o ga imatelt ega
SFX o ga imateltki ega
SFX o ga imatena ega
SFX o ga imatenagi ega
SFX o ga imateni ega
SFX o ga imatenigi ega
SFX o ga imates ega
SFX o ga imateski ega
SFX o ga imatesse ega
SFX o ga imatessegi ega
SFX o ga imatest ega
SFX o ga imatestki ega
SFX o ga imateta ega
SFX o ga imatetagi ega
SFX o ga imatki ega
SFX o ga imgi ega
SFX o ga ina uga
SFX o ga inagi uga
SFX o ga ini uga
SFX o ga inigi uga
SFX o ga iski uga
SFX o ga issegi uga
SFX o ga istki uga
SFX o ga ita uga
SFX o ga itagi uga
SFX o ga te iga
SFX o ga tega iga
SFX o ga tegagi aga
SFX o ga tegi aga
SFX o ga teks iga
SFX o ga tekski aga
SFX o ga tel iga
SFX o ga tele iga
SFX o ga telegi aga
SFX o ga telgi aga
SFX o ga telt iga
SFX o ga teltki aga
SFX o ga tena iga
SFX o ga tenagi aga
SFX o ga teni iga
SFX o ga tenigi aga
SFX o ga tes iga
SFX o ga teski aga
SFX o ga tesse iga
SFX o ga tessegi aga
SFX o ga test iga
SFX o ga testki aga
SFX o ga teta iga
SFX o ga tetagi aga

# rule/flag 5289 (affects 6989 words, has 34 subrules):
SFX p Y 34
SFX p 0 de a
SFX p 0 dega a
SFX p 0 degagi a
SFX p 0 degi a
SFX p 0 deks a
SFX p 0 dekski a
SFX p 0 del a
SFX p 0 dele a
SFX p 0 delegi a
SFX p 0 delgi a
SFX p 0 delt a
SFX p 0 deltki a
SFX p 0 dena a
SFX p 0 denagi a
SFX p 0 deni a
SFX p 0 denigi a
SFX p 0 des a
SFX p 0 deski a
SFX p 0 desse a
SFX p 0 dessegi a
SFX p 0 dest a
SFX p 0 destki a
SFX p 0 deta a
SFX p 0 detagi a
SFX p d ma ud
SFX p d magi ud
SFX p d maks ud
SFX p d makski ud
SFX p d mas ud
SFX p d maski ud
SFX p d mast ud
SFX p d mastki ud
SFX p d mata ud
SFX p d matagi ud

# rule/flag 6702 (affects 9716 words, has 32 subrules):
SFX q Y 32
SFX q 0 v a
SFX q 0 vgi a
SFX q 0 vus a
SFX q 0 vuski a
SFX q 0 vusse a
SFX q 0 vussegi a
SFX q 0 vust a
SFX q 0 vustki a
SFX q d tega ud
SFX q d tegagi ud
SFX q d teks ud
SFX q d tekski ud
SFX q d tel ud
SFX q d tele ud
SFX q d telegi ud
SFX q d telgi ud
SFX q d telt ud
SFX q d teltki ud
SFX q d tena ud
SFX q d tenagi ud
SFX q d teni ud
SFX q d tenigi ud
SFX q d tes ud
SFX q d teski ud
SFX q d tesse ud
SFX q d tessegi ud
SFX q d test ud
SFX q d testki ud
SFX q d teta ud
SFX q d tetagi ud
SFX q ne st [ai]ne
SFX q ne stki [ai]ne

# rule/flag 6746 (affects 14328 words, has 42 subrules):
SFX r Y 42
SFX r 0 b a
SFX r 0 dki i
SFX r 0 ksid a
SFX r 0 ksime a
SFX r 0 ksin a
SFX r 0 ksite a
SFX r 0 me a
SFX r 0 megi i
SFX r 0 n a
SFX r 0 ngi i
SFX r 0 segi s
SFX r 0 tegi i
SFX r d id ud
SFX r d idki ud
SFX r d iga ud
SFX r d igagi ud
SFX r d iks ud
SFX r d ikski ud
SFX r d il ud
SFX r d ile ud
SFX r d ilegi ud
SFX r d ilgi ud
SFX r d ilt ud
SFX r d iltki ud
SFX r d ina ud
SFX r d inagi ud
SFX r d ini ud
SFX r d inigi ud
SFX r d is ud
SFX r d iski ud
SFX r d isse ud
SFX r d issegi ud
SFX r d ist ud
SFX r d istki ud
SFX r d ita ud
SFX r d itagi ud
SFX r ne sus [aeilruv]ne
SFX r ne suski [aeilruv]ne
SFX r ne susse [aeilruv]ne
SFX r ne sussegi [aeilruv]ne
SFX r ne sust [aeilruv]ne
SFX r ne sustki [aeilruv]ne

# rule/flag 6751 (affects 12554 words, has 92 subrules):
SFX s Y 92
SFX s 0 bki a
SFX s 0 d i
SFX s 0 isid t
SFX s 0 isidki t
SFX s 0 ksidki a
SFX s 0 ksimegi a
SFX s 0 ksingi a
SFX s 0 ksitegi a
SFX s 0 me i
SFX s 0 megi a
SFX s 0 n i
SFX s 0 ngi a
SFX s 0 s e
SFX s 0 se s
SFX s 0 sime e
SFX s 0 simegi e
SFX s 0 sin e
SFX s 0 singi e
SFX s 0 site e
SFX s 0 sitegi e
SFX s 0 ski e
SFX s 0 te i
SFX s d m ud
SFX s d mad ud
SFX s d madki ud
SFX s d maga ud
SFX s d magagi ud
SFX s d maid ud
SFX s d maidki ud
SFX s d maiga ud
SFX s d maigagi ud
SFX s d maiks ud
SFX s d maikski ud
SFX s d mail ud
SFX s d maile ud
SFX s d mailegi ud
SFX s d mailgi ud
SFX s d mailt ud
SFX s d mailtki ud
SFX s d maina ud
SFX s d mainagi ud
SFX s d maini ud
SFX s d mainigi ud
SFX s d mais ud
SFX s d maiski ud
SFX s d maisse ud
SFX s d maissegi ud
SFX s d maist ud
SFX s d maistki ud
SFX s d maita ud
SFX s d maitagi ud
SFX s d mal ud
SFX s d male ud
SFX s d malegi ud
SFX s d malgi ud
SFX s d malt ud
SFX s d maltki ud
SFX s d mana ud
SFX s d managi ud
SFX s d mani ud
SFX s d manigi ud
SFX s d masse ud
SFX s d massegi ud
SFX s d mat ud
SFX s d mate ud
SFX s d matega ud
SFX s d mategagi ud
SFX s d mategi ud
SFX s d mateks ud
SFX s d matekski ud
SFX s d matel ud
SFX s d matele ud
SFX s d matelegi ud
SFX s d matelgi ud
SFX s d matelt ud
SFX s d mateltki ud
SFX s d matena ud
SFX s d matenagi ud
SFX s d mateni ud
SFX s d matenigi ud
SFX s d mates ud
SFX s d mateski ud
SFX s d matesse ud
SFX s d matessegi ud
SFX s d matest ud
SFX s d matestki ud
SFX s d mateta ud
SFX s d matetagi ud
SFX s d matki ud
SFX s d mgi ud
SFX s d sti ud
SFX s d stigi ud

# rule/flag 8541 (affects 9416 words, has 26 subrules):
SFX t Y 26
SFX t 0 maks a
SFX t 0 makski a
SFX t 0 mas a
SFX t 0 maski a
SFX t 0 mast a
SFX t 0 mastki a
SFX t 0 mata a
SFX t 0 matagi a
SFX t d ga ud
SFX t d gagi ud
SFX t d l ud
SFX t d le ud
SFX t d legi ud
SFX t d lgi ud
SFX t d lt ud
SFX t d ltki ud
SFX t d na ud
SFX t d nagi ud
SFX t d ni ud
SFX t d nigi ud
SFX t d sse ud
SFX t d ssegi ud
SFX t d st ud
SFX t d stki ud
SFX t ne sse [ai]ne
SFX t ne ssegi [ai]ne

# rule/flag 8542 (affects 16252 words, has 114 subrules):
SFX u Y 114
SFX u 0 b e
SFX u 0 bki e
SFX u 0 dki e
SFX u 0 gi i
SFX u 0 i t
SFX u 0 igi t
SFX u 0 ki k
SFX u 0 ks e
SFX u 0 ksid e
SFX u 0 ksidki e
SFX u 0 ksime e
SFX u 0 ksimegi e
SFX u 0 ksin e
SFX u 0 ksingi e
SFX u 0 ksite e
SFX u 0 ksitegi e
SFX u 0 kski e
SFX u 0 me e
SFX u 0 megi e
SFX u 0 mine a
SFX u 0 minegi a
SFX u 0 misse a
SFX u 0 missegi a
SFX u 0 mist a
SFX u 0 mistki a
SFX u 0 n e
SFX u 0 ngi e
SFX u 0 sime a
SFX u 0 simegi a
SFX u 0 sin a
SFX u 0 singi a
SFX u 0 site a
SFX u 0 sitegi a
SFX u 0 te e
SFX u 0 tegi e
SFX u 0 tki s
SFX u d im ud
SFX u d ima ud
SFX u d imad ud
SFX u d imadki ud
SFX u d imaga ud
SFX u d imagagi ud
SFX u d imagi ud
SFX u d imaid ud
SFX u d imaidki ud
SFX u d imaiga ud
SFX u d imaigagi ud
SFX u d imaiks ud
SFX u d imaikski ud
SFX u d imail ud
SFX u d imaile ud
SFX u d imailegi ud
SFX u d imailgi ud
SFX u d imailt ud
SFX u d imailtki ud
SFX u d imaina ud
SFX u d imainagi ud
SFX u d imaini ud
SFX u d imainigi ud
SFX u d imais ud
SFX u d imaiski ud
SFX u d imaisse ud
SFX u d imaissegi ud
SFX u d imaist ud
SFX u d imaistki ud
SFX u d imaita ud
SFX u d imaitagi ud
SFX u d imaks ud
SFX u d imakski ud
SFX u d imal ud
SFX u d imale ud
SFX u d imalegi ud
SFX u d imalgi ud
SFX u d imalt ud
SFX u d imaltki ud
SFX u d imana ud
SFX u d imanagi ud
SFX u d imani ud
SFX u d imanigi ud
SFX u d imas ud
SFX u d imaski ud
SFX u d imasse ud
SFX u d imassegi ud
SFX u d imast ud
SFX u d imastki ud
SFX u d imat ud
SFX u d imata ud
SFX u d imatagi ud
SFX u d imate ud
SFX u d imatega ud
SFX u d imategagi ud
SFX u d imategi ud
SFX u d imateks ud
SFX u d imatekski ud
SFX u d imatel ud
SFX u d imatele ud
SFX u d imatelegi ud
SFX u d imatelgi ud
SFX u d imatelt ud
SFX u d imateltki ud
SFX u d imatena ud
SFX u d imatenagi ud
SFX u d imateni ud
SFX u d imatenigi ud
SFX u d imates ud
SFX u d imateski ud
SFX u d imatesse ud
SFX u d imatessegi ud
SFX u d imatest ud
SFX u d imatestki ud
SFX u d imateta ud
SFX u d imatetagi ud
SFX u d imatki ud
SFX u d imgi ud

# rule/flag 12638 (affects 7016 words, has 20 subrules):
SFX v Y 20
SFX v 0 ga a
SFX v 0 gagi a
SFX v 0 l a
SFX v 0 le a
SFX v 0 legi a
SFX v 0 lgi a
SFX v 0 lt a
SFX v 0 ltki a
SFX v 0 na a
SFX v 0 nagi a
SFX v 0 ni a
SFX v 0 nigi a
SFX v 0 sse a
SFX v 0 ssegi a
SFX v 0 st a
SFX v 0 stki a
SFX v d ksid ud
SFX v d ksime ud
SFX v d ksin ud
SFX v d ksite ud
